Maine, session 132, LD100.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1742, sub-§6, as corrected by RR 2013, c. 1, §10, is amended by
amending the 3rd blocked paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding this subsection, the bureau may select a person or persons to perform
professional, architectural or engineering services from the list described in this subsection
without advertising or competitive selection if the cost of the services does not exceed
$25,000 $50,000. The bureau shall solicit names for placement on a list by placing a
general advertisement for professional, architectural or engineering services in newspapers
that taken together have general circulation throughout the State. The bureau may
substitute advertisement in professional journals or other publications that it finds equally
effective in reaching the intended audience. The bureau may require persons responding
to the advertisement to complete a qualifying questionnaire designed to address experience
and expertise in performing the type of work advertised. The bureau shall prepare a list of
respondents that it determines qualified and update the list at least every 2 years.
Page 1 - 132LR0238(03)